Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Chapter 30. Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act.

Revisor's notes. —

In 1980, pursuant to § 60, ch. 94, SLA 1980, the term “workers”’ was substituted for “workmen’s” wherever appearing in this chapter.

Cross references. —

For provision establishing a legislative workers’ compensation working group and requiring a report to the legislature by December 1, 2019, see sec. 23, ch. 91, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For workers’ compensation, see 8 AAC, part 3.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 10, FSSLA 2005 (SB 130), the basis of a number of the 2005 amendments to this chapter, see 2005 Senate Journal 465 — 468.

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 91, SLA 2018 (HB 79), the basis of a number of the 2018 amendments to this chapter, see 2017 House Journal 97 — 101.

Collateral references. —

Daniel J. Stone, Occupational Injuries and Illnesses (Matthew Bender).

Larson and Larson, Larson’s Workers’ Compensation Law (Matthew Bender).

Larson and Larson, Larson’s Workers’ Compensation, Desk Edition (Matthew Bender).